North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 3. Revocation of Certificate of Authority.

§ 55A-15-30.
Grounds for revocation.

The Secretary of State may commence a proceeding under

G.S. 55A-15-31

to revoke the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this State if:

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 539, s. 28.

The foreign corporation does not pay within 60 days after they are due any penalties, fees, or other payments due under this Chapter;

The foreign corporation is without a registered agent or registered office in this State for 60 days or more;

The foreign corporation does not inform the Secretary of State under

G.S. 55D-31

or

G.S. 55D-32

that its registered agent or registered office has changed, that its registered agent has resigned, or that its registered office has been discontinued within 60 days of the change, resignation, or discontinuance;

An incorporator, director, officer, or agent of the foreign corporation signs a document he knew was false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing;

The Secretary of State receives a duly authenticated certificate from the secretary of state or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law the foreign corporation is incorporated stating that it has been dissolved or disappeared as the result of a merger;

The corporation is exceeding the authority conferred upon it by this Chapter; or

The corporation knowingly fails or refuses to answer truthfully and fully within the time prescribed in this Chapter interrogatories propounded by the Secretary of State in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.

Nothing herein shall be deemed to repeal or modify any provision of the Revenue Act relating to the suspension of the certificate of authority of foreign corporations for failure to comply with the provisions thereof.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 509, s. 32; c. 539, s. 28; 2001-358, s. 48(f); 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§ 55A-15-31.
Procedure and effect of revocation.

If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist under

G.S. 55A-15-30

for revocation of a certificate of authority, the Secretary of State shall mail to the foreign corporation written notice of the Secretary of State’s determination.

If the foreign corporation does not correct each ground for revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist within 60 days after notice is mailed, the Secretary of State may revoke the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority by signing a certificate of revocation that recites the ground or grounds for revocation and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate and mail a copy to the foreign corporation.

The authority of a foreign corporation to conduct affairs in this State ceases on the date shown on the certificate revoking its certificate of authority.

The Secretary of State’s revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority appoints the Secretary of State the foreign corporation’s agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising in this State or arising out of affairs conducted in this State during the time the foreign corporation was authorized to conduct affairs in this State. The Secretary of State shall then proceed in accordance with

G.S. 55D-33

.

Revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

The corporation shall not be granted a new certificate of authority until each ground for revocation has been substantially corrected to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 400, s. 10; 2001-358, s. 48(g); 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§ 55A-15-32.
Appeal from revocation.

A foreign corporation may appeal the Secretary of State’s revocation of its certificate of authority to the Superior Court of Wake County within 30 days after service of the certificate of revocation is mailed. The appeal is commenced by filing a petition with the court and with the Secretary of State requesting the court to set aside the revocation. The petition shall have attached to it copies of the corporation’s certificate of authority and the Secretary of State’s certificate of revocation. No service of process on the Secretary of State is required except for the filing of the petition as set forth in this subsection. The appeal to the superior court shall be determined by a judge of the superior court upon such further evidence, notice, and opportunity to be heard, if any, as the court may deem appropriate under the circumstances. The foreign corporation shall have the burden of establishing that it is entitled to have the revocation set aside.

Upon consideration of the petition and any response made by the Secretary of State, the court may, prior to entering final judgment, order the Secretary of State to set aside the revocation or may take any other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1; c. 553, s. 83(b); 2001-358, s. 5A(d); 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§ 55A-15-33.
Inapplicability of Administrative Procedure Act.

The Administrative Procedure Act shall not apply to any proceeding or appeal provided for in

G.S. 55A-15-30

through

G.S. 55A-15-32

.

History.

1995, c. 400, s. 11.